Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.5551] MINNESOTA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH REVIEW OF HOSPITAL CAMPUS CLOSURES OR CHANGES IN OPERATIONS. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, "hospital" means an acute care institution licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58. new text end new text begin (b) Unless a public interest review has been approved by the Minnesota Department of Health, a hospital or hospital campus is prohibited from: new text end new text begin (1) curtailing operations to the extent that patients must be relocated; new text end new text begin (2) relocating the provision of health services to another hospital or another hospital campus; new text end new text begin (3) ceasing to offer operating room services, intensive care unit services, pediatric overnight services; or new text end new text begin (4) implementing an action listed in clauses (1) to (3) for which notice was provided to the commissioner of health and the public under section 144.555, before the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin (c) The public interest review process required under paragraph (b) must be substantially similar to the public interest review conducted under section 144.552. new text end new text begin (d) Paragraph (b) does not apply if: new text end new text begin (1) the hospital ceases operations due to insolvency of the corporation in accordance with chapter 317A, or if insolvency proceedings are commenced under chapter 60B; or new text end new text begin (2) the cessation in or curtailment of operations, relocation of health services, or cessation in offering certain health services is necessary, as determined by the commissioner of health, because of a fire, tornado, flood, storm damage, or other similar disaster. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner of health must enforce this section using the powers and authority in section 144.653. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end